Florida, session 2026, HB1215.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 461.0182, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
461.0182 Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact;
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1215-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1215 2026
public records and meetings exemptions.—
(1) A podiatric physician's personal identifying
information, other than the podiatric physician's name,
licensure status, licensure number, obtained from the
coordinated information system, as described in Article VIII of
s. 461.0181, and held by the department or the board is exempt
from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution
unless the state that originally reported the information to the
coordinated information system authorizes the disclosure of such
information by law. If disclosure is so authorized, such
information may be disclosed only to the extent authorized by
the law of the reporting state.
(2)(a) A meeting or a portion of a meeting of the
Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact Commission or the
executive committee or other committee of the commission,
established in Article XI of s. 461.0181, at which matters
specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or state law
are discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of
the State Constitution.
(b) Recordings, minutes, and records generated during an
exempt meeting or portion of such a meeting are exempt from s.
119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution.
(3) This section is subject to the Open Government Sunset
Review Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed
on October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1215-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1215 2026
through reenactment by the Legislature.
Section 2. (1) The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that a podiatric physician's personal identifying
information, other than the podiatric physicians name, licensure
status, or licensure number, obtained from the coordinated
information system, as described in Article VIII of s. 461.0181,
Florida Statutes, and held by the Department of Health or the
Board of Podiatric Medicine be made exempt from s. 119.07(1),
Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the State
Constitution. Protection of such information is required under
the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact, which a
state must adopt in order to become a member state of the
compact. Without the public records exemption, this state will
be unable to effectively implement and administer the compact.
(2)(a) The Legislature finds that it is a public necessity
that any meeting of the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure
Compact Commission or the executive committee or other committee
of the commission held as provided in s. 461.0181, Florida
Statutes, in which matters specifically exempted from disclosure
by federal or state law are discussed be made exempt from s.
286.011, Florida Statutes, and s. 24(b), Article I of the State
Constitution.
(b) The Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact
requires the closure of any meeting, or any portion of a
meeting, of the Interstate Podiatric Medical Licensure Compact
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1215-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1215 2026
Commission or the executive committee or other committee of the
commission if the presiding officer announces in a public
meeting that, in connection with the performance of the
commission's duties, the commission must discuss certain
sensitive and confidential subject matters. In the absence of a
public meetings exemption, this state would be prohibited from
becoming a member state of the compact.
(3) The Legislature also finds that it is a public
necessity that the recordings, minutes, and records generated
during a meeting held as provided in s. 491.022, Florida
Statutes, which is exempt from public meetings requirements be
made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a),
Article I of the State Constitution. Release of such information
would negate the public meetings exemption. As such, the
Legislature finds that the public records exemption is a public
necessity.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 1213 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1215-00